Maryland, session 2026, HB0956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “condominium” has the meaning stated in § 11–101 of the Real
Property Article.
(b) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall conduct a
study on buildings in the State that are more than 40 years old and contain a condominium.
(c) The study required under subsection (b) of this section shall determine:
(1) the number of buildings in the State that are more than 40 years old
and contain a condominium;
(2) the number of condominium units within each building described under
item (1) of this subsection;
(3) the average age of each the condominium unit owner owners in each
building described under item (1) of this subsection;
(4) the average annual income of each the condominium unit owner owners
in each building described under item (1) of this subsection;
(5) the date on which the most recent reserve study was completed for each
building described under item (1) of this subsection; and
(6) the difference between the current amount in each reserve fund and the
amount that is required to be in each reserve fund for each building described under item
(1) of this subsection, if any.
(d) On or before December 1, 2026, the Department of Housing and Community
Development shall report the findings of the study to the General Assembly, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
– 1 –

Ch. 779 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –